Florida, session 2026, SB1180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 63 64 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 125.572, Florida 65 Statutes, is amended to read: 66 125.572âRegulation of synthetic turf.â 67 (3)(a)âUpon the Department of Environmental Protection 68 adopting rules pursuant to subsection (4), a local government 69 may not: 70 1.(a)âAdopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, order, 71 rule, or policy that prohibits, or is enforced to prohibit, a 72 property owner from installing synthetic turf that complies with 73 Department of Environmental Protection standards adopted 74 pursuant to this section which apply to single-family 75 residential property. 76 2.(b)âAdopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, order, 77 rule, or policy that regulates synthetic turf which is 78 inconsistent with the Department of Environmental Protection 79 standards adopted pursuant to this section which apply to 80 single-family residential property. 81 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to the adoption or 82 enforcement of any resolution, order, rule, or policy by a 83 community development district to enforce deed restrictions. 84 Section 2.âSubsection (7) of section 190.003, Florida 85 Statutes, is amended to read: 86 190.003âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 87 (7)ââCompact, urban, mixed-use districtâ means a district 88 consisting of a maximum of 75 acres which is located within a 89 municipality, and within either a qualified opportunity zone 90 designated by the United States Department of the Treasury 91 pursuant to 26 U.S.C. s. 1400Z-1 or a community redevelopment 92 area created pursuant to s. 163.356, which district that 93 consists of a maximum of 75 acres, and has development 94 entitlements of: 95 (a)âAt least 400,000 square feet of retail development and 96 500 residential units; or 97 (b)âAt least 250,000 square feet of commercial development 98 and 500 residential rental units that are affordable for very 99 low-income, low-income, or moderate-income persons, as defined 100 in s. 420.0004, s. 420.602, or s. 420.9071. 101 Section 3.âSection 190.0071, Florida Statutes, is created 102 to read: 103 190.0071âCommunity development district recall.â 104 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 105 (a)ââClerk,â as the context requires, means: 106 1.âIf the community development district was established by 107 ordinance of a local general-purpose government pursuant to s. 108 190.005(2), the clerk of such local general-purpose government. 109 2.âIf the community development district was established by 110 rule of the Florida Land and Water Adjudicatory Commission 111 pursuant to s. 190.005(1), the clerk of the circuit court of the 112 county that contains a majority of the qualified electors of the 113 district. 114 (b)ââSubdistrictâ means the area or region previously 115 contained in a community development district that has been 116 merged with one or more other community development districts to 117 form a surviving merged district pursuant to s. 190.046. 118 (2)âAPPLICATION.âAny member of the board of supervisors of 119 a community development district who is elected to the board by 120 the qualified electors of the community development district may 121 be removed from office by the qualified electors of the 122 district. To be subject to recall, the member must have served 123 at least one-fourth of his or her term of office at the time a 124 petition is filed as provided in subsection (4). If the member 125 represents a subdistrict and is elected only by electors 126 residing in that subdistrict, only electors residing in that 127 subdistrict are eligible to sign the petition to recall that 128 member and are entitled to vote in the recall election. If the 129 member is elected at large by the electors of the district, all 130 electors of the district are eligible to sign the petition to 131 recall that member and are entitled to vote in the recall 132 election. Members may be removed from office pursuant to the 133 procedures provided in this section. 134 (3)âGROUNDS FOR RECALL.âThe grounds for removal of members 135 of the board of supervisors of a district elected by qualified 136 electors are, for the purposes of this act, limited to the 137 following reasons and must be contained in the recall petition: 138 (a)âMalfeasance; 139 (b)âMisfeasance; 140 (c)âNeglect of duty; 141 (d)âDrunkenness; 142 (e)âIncompetence; 143 (f)âPermanent inability to perform official duties; or 144 (g)âConviction of a felony involving moral turpitude. 145 (4)âRECALL PETITION.â 146 (a)âPetition content.âA recall petition must contain the 147 name of the board member sought to be recalled and a statement 148 of grounds for recall, which are limited solely to those 149 specified in subsection (3). If more than one member of the 150 board of supervisors is sought to be recalled, regardless of 151 whether such member is elected by the electors of a district or 152 by the electors of a subdistrict, a separate recall petition 153 must be prepared for each board member sought to be recalled. 154 (b)âRequisite signatures.âThe petition must be signed by at 155 least 10 percent of the total number of registered electors of 156 the district or of a subdistrict. 157 (c)âRecall committee.âThe qualified electors of the 158 district making charges contained in the statement of grounds 159 for recall, as well as those signing the recall petition, must 160 be designated as the recall committee. A specific person must be 161 designated in the petition as chair of the committee, and such 162 person shall act on behalf of the committee. The recall 163 committee and the board member being recalled are subject to 164 chapter 106. 165 (d)âSignature process.âOnly electors of the district or 166 subdistrict, as applicable, are eligible to sign the recall 167 petition. Each petition must contain appropriate lines for each 168 electorâs original signature, which signature must be made in 169 ink or indelible pencil; printed name; street address; city; 170 county; voter registration number or date of birth; Florida 171 driver license number, Florida identification card number issued 172 pursuant to s. 322.051, or the last four digits of the electorâs 173 social security number; and the date signed. 174 (e)âFiling of signed petitions.âThe recall petition and its 175 accompanying signature pages must be filed by the chair of the 176 recall committee no later than 35 days after the date on which 177 the first signature is obtained on the recall petition. The 178 petition may not be amended after it is filed with the clerk, 179 except as provided in subparagraph (h)3. 180 (f)âNotification.âThe clerk shall provide written notice, 181 by certified mail, to both the districtâs registered agent and 182 the board member subject to recall that a recall petition has 183 been filed, and provide a copy of such petition, within 7 days 184 of receipt of the recall petition. 185 (g)âVerification of signatures.â 186 1.âNo more than 60 days after the date on which the recall 187 petition is filed, the clerk shall submit the recall petition to 188 the supervisor of elections, who shall promptly verify the 189 signatures in accordance with s. 99.097 and determine whether 190 the requisite number of valid signatures has been obtained. The 191 recall committee must pay in advance to the supervisor of 192 elections the actual cost of such signature verification. If the 193 community development district lies in more than one county, the 194 clerk must submit the recall petition to the supervisor of 195 elections in each county in which the district is located. In 196 such event, the supervisor of elections of each county shall 197 determine the number of verified and valid signatures that have 198 been submitted for their respective jurisdictions, and upon 199 receipt of such determinations, the supervisor of elections of 200 the county in which the clerk is located shall be responsible 201 for providing the reporting required by paragraph (h). 202 2.âThe petition and its accompanying documents provided to 203 the clerk must, upon request, be made available in alternative 204 formats by the recall committee as requested by the clerk. 205 (h)âReporting.â 206 1.âIf the supervisor of elections determines that the 207 recall petition does not contain the requisite number of 208 verified and valid signatures, the recall proceedings are 209 terminated and the clerk must provide written notice of such 210 insufficiency determination and termination of recall 211 proceedings to the districtâs registered agent, the board member 212 subject to recall, and the recall committee without taking 213 further action. Any recall petition deemed insufficient may not 214 be used in any other proceeding. 215 2.âIf the supervisor of elections determines that the 216 petition has the requisite number of verified and valid 217 signatures, the clerk must provide written notice, by certified 218 mail, to the districtâs registered agent and the recall 219 committee of the recall petition sufficiency determination, and 220 shall serve upon the board member sought to be recalled, by 221 certified mail, notice of such certification and a request that 222 the board member submit a rebuttal statement to the clerk within 223 30 days after receipt of the request. 224 3.âA qualified elector may have his or her name removed 225 from the recall petition by submitting a signed request in 226 writing to the clerk stating such intention. Such request must 227 be made no later than 30 days after the date the elector signed 228 the petition. Within 7 days after a qualified elector notifying 229 the clerk to remove his or her name from the recall petition, 230 the clerk shall recalculate the current percentage of verified 231 and valid signatures. If the clerk determines that the number of 232 current verified and valid signatures falls below the threshold 233 required by paragraph (b), the clerk must send written notice of 234 such insufficiency determination and termination of recall 235 proceedings to the districtâs registered agent, the board member 236 subject to recall, and the recall committee without taking 237 further action. 238 (5)âRECORD OF RECALL PROCEEDINGS.âIf the supervisor of 239 elections determines that a recall petition has the requisite 240 number of verified and valid signatures, and within 30 days 241 after the date of receipt of the rebuttal statement or after the 242 last date a rebuttal statement could have been filed, the clerk 243 must prepare a document entitled âRecord of Recall Proceedings.â 244 The Record of Recall Proceedings must include the recall 245 petition, the determination of the supervisor of elections 246 regarding the amount of verified and valid signatures, and the 247 rebuttal statement, if provided, or, if no rebuttal statement 248 was received, an indication that none was received. The Record 249 of Recall Proceedings must be sent by certified mail to the 250 districtâs registered agent, the board member subject to recall, 251 and the chair of the recall committee. The district shall post 252 the Record of Recall Proceedings on its website within 14 days 253 after receipt. 254 (6)âRECALL REFERENDUM PETITION.â 255 (a)âPetition content.âUpon the receipt of the Record of 256 Recall Proceedings, the recall committee may circulate a 257 petition on whether a referendum to recall the board member 258 should be held. A recall referendum petition must contain the 259 name of the person sought to be recalled and a copy of the 260 Record of Recall Proceedings. 261 (b)âRequisite signatures.âThe signed recall referendum must 262 be signed by at least 15 percent of the electors. 263 (c)âSignature process.âAll qualified electors of the 264 district are eligible to sign the recall referendum petition. 265 Each recall referendum petition must contain appropriate lines 266 for each qualified electorâs original signature, which signature 267 shall be made in ink or indelible pencil; printed name; street 268 address; city; county; voter registration number or date of 269 birth; Florida driver license number, Florida identification 270 card number issued pursuant to s. 322.051, or the last four 271 digits of the qualified electorâs social security number; and 272 the date signed. 273 (d)âFiling of signed petitions.âThe signed recall 274 referendum petition and its accompanying signature pages must be 275 filed with the clerk no later than 60 days after the chair of 276 the recall committeeâs receipt of the Record of Recall 277 Proceedings. 278 (e)âNotification.âThe clerk shall provide written notice, 279 by certified mail, to both the districtâs registered agent and 280 the board member subject to recall that a recall referendum 281 petition has been filed, and provide a copy of such petition, 282 within 7 days after receipt of the recall referendum petition. 283 (f)âVerification of signatures.â 284 1.âNo more than 30 days after the date on which the recall 285 referendum petition is filed, the clerk shall submit the recall 286 referendum petition to the supervisor of elections, who shall 287 promptly verify the signatures in accordance with s. 99.097 and 288 determine whether the requisite number of valid signatures has 289 been obtained. The recall committee must pay in advance to the 290 supervisor of elections the actual cost of such signature 291 verification. If the community development district lies in more 292 than one county, the clerk must submit the recall referendum 293 petition to the supervisor of elections in each county in which 294 the district is located. In such event, the supervisor of 295 elections of each county shall determine the number of verified 296 and valid signatures that have been submitted for his or her 297 respective jurisdiction, and upon receipt of such 298 determinations, the supervisor of elections of the county in 299 which the clerk is located shall be responsible for providing 300 the reporting required by paragraph (g). 301 2.âThe recall referendum petition and its accompanying 302 documents provided to the clerk must, upon request, be made 303 available in alternative formats by the recall committee as 304 requested by the clerk. 305 (g)âReporting.â 306 1.âIf the supervisor of elections determines that the 307 recall referendum petition does not contain the requisite number 308 of verified and valid signatures, the recall vote proceedings 309 are terminated and the clerk must provide written notice of such 310 insufficiency determination and termination of recall vote 311 proceedings to the registered agent of the district, the board 312 member subject to recall, and the recall committee without 313 taking further action. Any recall referendum petition deemed 314 insufficient may not be used in any other proceeding. 315 2.âIf the supervisor of elections determines that the 316 recall referendum petition has the requisite number of verified 317 and valid signatures, the clerk must provide written notice, by 318 certified mail, to the districtâs registered agent, the board 319 member sought to be recalled, and the recall committee of the 320 recall referendum petition sufficiency determination and the 321 date, time, and location of the recall referendum. 322 3.âA qualified elector may have his or her name removed 323 from the recall referendum petition by submitting a signed 324 written request to the clerk stating such intention. Such 325 request must be made no later than 30 days after the date the 326 elector signed the petition. Within 7 days after a qualified 327 elector notifying the clerk to remove his or her name from the 328 recall referendum petition, the clerk shall recalculate the 329 current percentage of verified and valid signatures. If the 330 number of current verified and valid signatures falls below the 331 threshold required by paragraph (b), the clerk must send written 332 notice of such insufficiency determination and termination of 333 recall proceedings to the districtâs registered agent, the board 334 member subject to recall, and the recall committee without 335 taking further action. 336 (7)âRECALL REFERENDUM.â 337 (a)âUpon its confirmation that the recall referendum 338 petition has the requisite number of verified and valid 339 signatures, the supervisor of elections shall fix a day for 340 holding the recall referendum. The supervisor of elections shall 341 administer such referendum in accordance with s. 190.006(3)(d). 342 The recall committee must pay in advance to the supervisor of 343 elections the actual cost of holding the recall referendum. 344 (b)âAny recall election must be held not less than 30 days 345 or more than 90 days after the certification, and at the same 346 time as any other general or special election held within such 347 period; but if no such election is to be held within that 348 period, the referendum must be conducted at a special election 349 to be held within the period aforesaid. 350 (c)âNotice of the recall referendum shall be published by 351 the district in a newspaper of general circulation in the area 352 of the district at least 14 days in advance of such referendum. 353 Notice of the recall referendum shall also be mailed to each 354 qualified elector at his or her last known address at least 14 355 days in advance of such referendum. The board shall use and rely 356 upon the official records maintained by the supervisor of 357 elections and property appraiser or tax collector in each county 358 in determining such addresses. The notices shall contain the 359 date, time, and location of the referendum and shall include a 360 statement that the Record of Recall Proceedings is available for 361 review on the districtâs website. The recall committee must pay 362 in advance to the district the actual cost of the recall 363 referendum notices. 364 (d)âThe ballots at the recall referendum must conform to 365 the following: With respect to each person whose removal is 366 sought, the question must be submitted: âShall (name of person) 367 be removed as a member of the board of supervisors of (name of 368 community development district) by recall?â Immediately 369 following each question there must be printed on the ballots the 370 two propositions in the following order: 371 â...(name of person)... should be removed from office.â 372 â...(name of person)... should not be removed from office.â 373 (e)âA recall referendum authorized by this section must be 374 canceled by the supervisor of elections if the board member 375 subject to the recall submits his or her resignation, which is 376 irrevocable, within 20 days after notice is sent via certified 377 mail pursuant to paragraph (6)(e). The district shall promptly 378 provide the clerk and the supervisor of elections a copy of any 379 such resignation, but no more than 7 days after receipt of such 380 resignation. 381 (8)âFILLING OF VACANCIES CREATED BY RECALL.â 382 (a)âIf a majority of the qualified electors of the district 383 or subdistrict voting in the recall referendum approves the 384 recall of the board member in the recall referendum, as 385 determined by the supervisor of elections, the board member 386 subject to the recall immediately ceases to hold office. The 387 vacancy created by the recall must be filled by the board of 388 supervisors pursuant to s. 190.006(4), except that, if three or 389 more board members are recalled at the same referendum, the 390 Governor must fill the vacancy pursuant to s. 114.04. 391 (b)âIf a majority of the qualified electors of the district 392 or subdistrict voting in the recall referendum do not approve 393 the recall, the recall proceedings are terminated. 394 (9)âRESTRICTIONS ON BOARD APPOINTMENT.âA person who is 395 removed by a recall pursuant to this section, or who resigns 396 after a petition has been filed against him or her, is not 397 eligible to be appointed to the districtâs board of supervisors 398 within a period of 2 years after the date of such recall or 399 resignation. 400 (10)âRETENTION OF PETITION.âThe clerk shall preserve all 401 papers comprising of or connected with a petition for recall for 402 a period of 2 years after such papers are filed. 403 (11)âOFFENSES RELATING TO RECALL PETITIONS AND RECALL 404 REFERENDUM PETITIONS.âA person may not impersonate another, 405 purposely write his or her name or residence falsely in the 406 signing of any recall petition or recall referendum petition or 407 forge any name thereto, or sign any paper with knowledge that he 408 or she is not a qualified elector of the district. A person may 409 not employ or pay another to accept employment or payment for 410 circulating or witnessing a recall petition or recall referendum 411 petition. A person who violates this subsection commits a 412 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 413 775.082 or s. 775.083. 414 Section 4.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (3) of 415 section 190.006, Florida Statutes, to read: 416 190.006âBoard of supervisors; members and meetings.â 417 (3) 418 (e)âAny board member elected to the board of supervisors by 419 the qualified electors of the district pursuant to this 420 subsection is subject to the recall procedures provided for in 421 s. 190.0071. 422 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.